src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexd
## Adjective inflection
#  --------------------
## The Hiligaynon language adjectives compare.

PATTERN Adjectives
:AdjPrefix Adj_Root AdjPrefix:
Adj_Root AdjSuffix
Adj_Uninflected [<A>:]
Adv_Root [<Adv>:]

LEXICON AdjPrefix
<A>:ma

LEXICON AdjSuffix
<A>:>on
